Tennessee, session 114, HB0333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-205(a)(3)(C), is amended by
deleting the language "or as the chief of a police department or a fire department" and
substituting "the chief of a police department or fire department, or as a firefighter with a rank
equal to or higher than shift commander".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0333
002016
- 1 -